Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.725

Term.

(1) Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, the supported decision-making agreement extends until terminated by either party or by the terms of the agreement.

(2) The supported decision-making agreement is terminated if:

(a) The department of social and health services finds that the adult with a disability has been abused, neglected, or exploited by the supporter;

(b) The supporter is found criminally liable for conduct described in (a) of this subsection;

(c) The person with a disability gives notice to the supporter orally, in writing, through an assistive technology device, or by any other means or act showing a specific intent to terminate the agreement; or

(d) The supporter provides written notice of the supporter's resignation to the person with a disability. If a supported decision-making agreement includes more than one supporter, each supporter can terminate the agreement only as to that supporter.

[ 2020 c 312 s 606.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.